Hawaii statutes.
§481B-11 Sensitivity-awareness group
seminars. Any person who deposits any money to attend a
sensitivity-awareness group seminar and before the first day of the seminar,
requests to cancel his or her right to attend and requests a refund of moneys
deposited or paid, shall be refunded in full less identifiable nonrecoverable
costs not to exceed the lesser of $50 or twenty per cent of the price of the
course, by the sensitivity-awareness group. Any person who while attending or
after completing a sensitivity-awareness seminar, deposits any money to attend
subsequent seminars of a sensitivity-awareness group and within five days of
making the deposit or before the first day of the subsequent seminar, whichever
occurs later, requests to cancel his or her right to attend and requests a
refund of moneys deposited or paid, shall be refunded in full less identifiable
nonrecoverable costs not to exceed the lesser of $50 or twenty per cent of the
price of the course, by the sensitivity-awareness group. Any offering of a
sensitivity-awareness group seminar by a representative of the
sensitivity-awareness group sponsoring the sensitivity-awareness group seminar
shall disclose to the offeree these rights of refund.

For purposes of this section,
"sensitivity-awareness groups" includes any individual, associated
group of persons, or organizations which advertise or assert that attendance by
persons at seminars, meetings, training sessions, therapy sessions, or the like
sponsored by the individual, group, or organization, will help the persons
attending have greater self-awareness or awareness of others, greater
self-understanding or understanding of others, or greater capacity for life
adjustment or success in life; provided that psychological or psychotherapeutic
techniques are used as part of the individual's, group's, or organization's
methodology at the seminars, meetings, training sessions, therapy sessions, or
the like. The term "sensitivity-awareness groups" does not include
licensed psychologists, or psychologists with a temporary permit, in accordance
with chapter 465, or a psychiatrist licensed in accordance with chapter 453,
who teach, direct, administer, conduct, preside over, or are similarly involved
in seminars, meetings, training sessions, therapy sessions, or the like.

"Sensitivity-awareness group
seminars" means any seminar, meeting, training session, therapy session,
or the like sponsored by a sensitivity-awareness group for which monetary
compensation is required from persons to attend. [L 1982, c 150, §2; am L 1985,
c 115, §17; am L 1996, c 59, §6; am L 2008, c 19, §16]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next